Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 14 Uniform Testamentary Additions to Trusts Act

18-14-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and cited as the “Uniform Testamentary Additions to Trusts Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 352, § 1.

18-14-2.
Testamentary additions to trusts.

A will may validly devise or bequeath property to the trustee of a trust established or to be established:

During the testator’s lifetime by the testator, by the testator and some other person, or by some other person, including a funded or unfunded life insurance trust, although the trustor has reserved any or all rights of ownership of the insurance contracts; or

At the testator’s death by the testator’s devise to the trustee, if the trust is identified in the testator’s will and its terms are set forth in a written instrument, other than a will, executed before, concurrently with, or after the execution of the testator’s will, or in another individual’s will if that other individual has predeceased the testator, regardless of the existence, size, or character of the corpus of the trust.

The devise or bequest is not invalid because the trust is amendable or revocable, or because the trust was amended after the execution of the will or the testator’s death.

Unless the testator’s will provides otherwise, property devised or bequeathed to a trust described in subsection (a) of this section is not held under a testamentary trust of the testator but it becomes a part of the trust to which it is devised or bequeathed, and must be administered and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of the governing instrument setting forth the terms of the trust, including any amendments to it made before or after the testator’s death.

Unless the testator’s will provides otherwise, a revocation or termination of the trust before the testator’s death causes the devise or bequest to lapse.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 352, § 1.

18-14-3.
Effect on existing wills.

This chapter applies to a will of a testator who dies after July 12, 1994.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 352, § 1.

18-14-4.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make the law uniform with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 352, § 1.

18-14-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 352, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 53, effective April 14, 2004.

18-14-6.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 352, § 1.